Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.150

Delivery to representatives.

If the money in the treasury is demanded within six years by the legal representatives of the deceased, the treasurer shall pay it to them after deducting the fees and expenses of the coroner and of the county in relation to the matter, or the same may be so paid at any time thereafter, upon the order of the board of county commissioners of the county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.24.150. Prior: Code 1881 s 2791; 1863 p 562 s 17; 1854 p 438 s 17; RRS s 4196.]